Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 2

Ginseng Harvest Season

70-8-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Ginseng Harvest Season Act of 1985”.

Acts 1985, ch. 177, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-26-101.

Cross-References. Ginseng dealers, title 62, ch. 28.

Nongame and Endangered or Threatened Wildlife Species Conservation Act of 1974, title 70, ch. 8, part 1.

Rare plant protection and conservation, title 70, ch. 8, part 3.

70-8-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cultivated ginseng” means ginseng growing in tilled beds under shade of artificial structures or under natural shade where shrubs or other competing vegetation have been removed and the soil has been prepared to enhance the growth of the ginseng;

“Export” means to transport, cause to be transported or deliver to any person for the purpose of transportation from any place in this state to any place outside of this state;

“Ginseng” means the plant panax quinquefolius of the araliaceae family;

“Landowner” means the owner or lessee of land or the duly authorized agent of such owner or lessee;

“Plantlets” means young or small plants, which naturally create stolons with plantlets on the ends as a form of asexual reproduction. Vegetative propagules or clippings of mature plants may be used to create plantlets;

“Prong” means a ginseng leaf with three (3) to five (5) leaflets;

“Sale” means any transfer of possession or ownership for money or other consideration; and

“Wild ginseng” means ginseng occurring in its native woodland habitat, and includes the ginseng that is growing naturally in that habitat or that was introduced or increased in abundance in its natural habitat by sowing ginseng seed, introducing plantlets sourced from wild ginseng stock, or by transplanting ginseng plants from other woodland areas.

Acts 1985, ch. 177, § 2; T.C.A., § 11-26-102; Acts 2019, ch. 125, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added the definition of “plantlets” and inserted “, introducing plantlets sourced from wild ginseng stock,” in the definition of “wild gingseng”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 125, § 3. April 9, 2019.

70-8-203. Dates of harvest season.

The harvest season for wild ginseng shall be from September 1 through December 31, inclusive, of each year.

Acts 1985, ch. 177, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-26-103; Acts 2012, ch. 591, § 1.

70-8-204. Prohibited activities.

It is unlawful for any person to dig, harvest, collect or remove wild ginseng from any land for the purpose of sale or export, on any date not within the wild ginseng harvest season established by § 70-8-203.

It is unlawful for any person to dig, harvest, collect or remove from any land, for the purpose of sale or export, any wild ginseng plant that has green berries or that has less than three (3) prongs.

It is unlawful for any person who has dug, harvested, collected or removed wild ginseng from any land for the purpose of sale or export to:

Remove the berries of the wild ginseng from the approximate location from which the wild ginseng was dug, harvested, collected or removed; or

Fail, immediately after such digging, harvest, collection or removal, to plant the berries of the wild ginseng in the approximate location from which the wild ginseng was dug, harvested, collected or removed.

It is unlawful to sell or offer for sale wild or cultivated ginseng that was harvested or collected from any state other than Tennessee unless such ginseng has been certified or otherwise approved for export by the state from which the ginseng was harvested, collected, or removed. A certificate shall accompany all wild and cultivated ginseng from other states showing that it has been certified and approved for export.

It is unlawful for any person, without permission of the landowner, to enter the property of the landowner and dig, harvest, collect, or remove wild or cultivated ginseng. This subsection (e) shall not apply to any employee or contractor of the federal government or of the state or of any political subdivision of the state engaged in any type of planning, construction, or maintenance work upon any proposed or existing federal, state, county, or other public road or highway, or highway right-of-way, while performing such work in the course of employment or contract work with the federal, state, or local government.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly dig, harvest, collect or remove wild ginseng from any land that such person does not own, on any date not within the wild ginseng harvest season established by § 70-8-203.

Acts 1985, ch. 177, §§ 4-8; T.C.A., § 11-26-104; Acts 2012, ch. 660, § 1.

70-8-205. Penalties.

A person violating this part commits a Class A misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and shall forfeit all ginseng harvested, collected, removed, or sold in violation of this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 177, § 9; T.C.A., § 11-26-105; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.